North Dakota, session 69, SB2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-36.7-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-36.7-08. Reinsurance.
For claims of an insured which total at least one hundred thousand dollars toand not more than
one million dollars incurred per plan year, a member insurer must be reinsured by the association at an
amount not exceeding seventy-five percent of the member insurer's responsibility for claims incurred by
the insured pursuant to the terms of an individual's nongrandfathered individual health benefit plan. The
board shall annually determine the attachment points and coinsurance percentage for association
claims for each plan year on or before April first of the preceding year.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2091 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2091 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 5 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State